Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Rules. new text begin (a) new text end The board shall, by rule, prescribe the requirements, duration, contents, and standards for successful completion of certified training programs for license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees, including: (1) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm, training in the proper use of, and the risks and dangers arising from the use of, firearms; (2) for those individuals who are armed with a weapon, training in the proper use of, and the risks and dangers arising from the use of, weapons other than firearms, including, but not limited to, bludgeons, nightsticks, batons, chemical weapons, and electronic incapacitation devices, and restraint or immobilization techniques; (3) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm or armed with a weapon, training in first aid and alternatives to the use of force, including advantages to not using force and specifically when force should not be used; (4) for those individuals who are armed with a firearm or armed with a weapon, training in the legal limitations on the justifiable use of force and deadly force as specified in sections 609.06 and 609.065; (5) standards for weapons and equipment issued to or carried or used by those individuals; (6) preassignment or on-the-job training, or its equivalent, required before applicants new text begin and applicants' qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees new text end may be certified as having completed training; and (7) continuing training for license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, employees, individuals armed with a firearm, and individuals armed with a weapon. new text begin (b) The board's rules prescribing preassignment training under paragraph (a), clause (6), and continuing training under paragraph (a), clause (7), must include, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) community health and wellness, including drug and alcohol addiction, homelessness, and mental illness; new text end new text begin (2) first aid, including training in administering cardiopulmonary resuscitation, using automated external defibrillators, and administering opiate antagonists; new text end new text begin (3) conflict and crisis de-escalation strategies and techniques for responding to incidents of violence, persons impaired by alcohol or a controlled substance, and persons suffering from a mental health crisis; new text end new text begin (4) orientation to the security industry; new text end new text begin (5) orientation to the entities responsible for public safety and the entities' duties and roles; new text end new text begin (6) the legal and industry standards for how license holders and license holders' agents and employees should interact with employees of other entities responsible for ensuring public safety; new text end new text begin (7) responding to disruptions in building operations, including electrical outages, water disruption, water leaks, flooding, elevator service disruptions, and elevator entrapments; new text end new text begin (8) identifying internal and external threats to buildings and the buildings' occupants; new text end new text begin (9) a citizen's authority to detain or arrest a person suspected of committing a crime and the legal obligations and liability associated with detaining or arresting a person; and new text end new text begin (10) best practices for safely detaining or restraining a person suspected of committing a crime. new text end new text begin (c) The board must establish an implementation plan for existing license holders to comply with the additional continuing training requirements under this subdivision. The implementation plan must reduce the training requirements for persons with prior relevant experience and training in other professions and occupations. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Classification of duties for protective agents and employees; training requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The board must use the security service tiers designated in this subdivision to determine training requirements needed for a license holder or an employee to perform the functions associated with each tier. At a minimum, a license holder or an employee must receive preassignment training according to paragraphs (b) to (f). new text end new text begin (b) "Tier 1 security services" include facility or event access control, crowd flow, and traffic and parking control. Tier 1 security services may require minimal use of force with no expectation of detaining persons. A person performing tier 1 security services must complete preassignment training that satisfies the requirements in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (3) to (6). new text end new text begin (c) "Tier 2 security services" include building access control, patrols, and escorting visitors with no expectation of detaining trespassers or other persons suspected of criminal conduct. A person performing tier 2 security services must complete preassignment training that satisfies the requirements in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (8). new text end new text begin (d) "Tier 3 security services" include providing unarmed high-risk building security and detaining trespassers or other persons suspected of criminal conduct. A person performing tier 3 security services must complete preassignment training that satisfies the requirements in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (10). new text end new text begin (e) "Tier 4 security services" include providing armed security in a high-risk environment, such as armored transport or critical infrastructure. A person performing tier 4 security services must complete preassignment training that satisfies the requirements in subdivision 1, paragraphs (a) and (b), clauses (1) to (10). new text end new text begin (f) "Tier 5 security services" include providing armed security for an individual or a group. A person performing tier 5 security services must complete preassignment training that satisfies the requirements in subdivision 1, paragraphs (a) and (b), clauses (2), (3), (5), (6), (9), and (10). new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3361, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required contents. new text begin (a) new text end The rules adopted by the board must require: (1) new text begin for persons assigned to perform tier 1 security services, a minimum of new text end 12 hours of preassignment or on-the-job certified training within the first 21 days of employmentdeleted text begin ,deleted text end or evidence that the employee has successfully completed equivalent training before the start of employmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) for persons assigned to perform tier 2 through 5 security services, a minimum of 40 hours of preassignment or on-the-job certified training within the first 21 days of employment or evidence that the employee has successfully completed equivalent training before the start of employment. new text end new text begin (b)new text end Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, deleted text begin this clausedeleted text end new text begin paragraph (a)new text end is satisfied if the employee provides a prospective employer with a certificate or a copy of a certificate demonstrating that the employee successfully completed this training prior to employment with a different Minnesota licensee and completed this training within three previous calendar years, or successfully completed this training with a Minnesota licensee while previously employed with a Minnesota licensee. The certificate or a copy of the certificate is the property of the employee who completed the training, regardless of who paid for the training or how training was provided. Upon a current or former employee's request, a current or former licensed employer must provide a copy of a certificate demonstrating the employee's successful completion of training to the current or former employee. The current or former licensed employer must not charge the employee a fee for a copy of the certificate. The employee who completed the training is entitled to access a copy of the certificate at no charge according to sections 181.960 to 181.966. A current or former employer must comply with sections 181.960 to 181.966deleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (c) Rules adopted by the board must establish criteria for persons subject to the training requirements in paragraph (a), clause (2), to receive credit for prior relevant experience and training acquired through service in other professions and occupations. new text end new text begin (d) The rules adopted by the board related to weapons possession must require: new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end certification by the board of completion of certified training for a license holder, qualified representative, Minnesota manager, partner, and employee to carry or use a firearm, a weapon other than a firearm, or an immobilizing or restraint technique; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end six hours a year of certified continuing training for all license holders, qualified representatives, Minnesota managers, partners, and employees, and an additional six hours a year for individuals who are armed with firearms or armed with weapons, which must include annual certification of the individual. new text begin (e) new text end An individual may not carry or use a weapon while undergoing on-the-job training deleted text begin under this subdivisiondeleted text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326.3381, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Proprietary employers. A proprietary employer is not required to obtain a license, but must comply with section 326.336, subdivision 1, with respect to the hiring of security guards.new text begin An employee of a proprietary employer who performs security functions must complete the training requirements in section 326.3361 and corresponding rules for the tier of security services that the employee is assigned to perform.new text end